test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-28tuetaerj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tütäŕ: # Noun (28) tütäŕ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Nom: tütäŕ
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Gen: tütre
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Par: tütärd
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Ill: [tütrehe, tütrede]
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Ine: [tütren, tütreh, tütrehn]
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Ela: tütrest
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+All: tütrele
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Ade: tütrel
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Abl: tütrelt
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Tra: tütres
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Ter: tütreniq
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Abe: tütreldäq
     tütäŕ+N+Sg+Com: tütregaq
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Nom: tütreq
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Gen: [tütride, tütriide, tütärde]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Par: [tütrit, tütriid]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Ill: [tütrihe, tütriihe, tütride, tütriide, tütärdehe]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Ine: [tütrin, tütriin, tütrih, tütriih, tütrihn, tütriihn, tütärden, tütärdeh, tütärdehn]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Ela: [tütrist, tütriist, tütärdest]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+All: [tütrile, tütriile, tütärdele]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Ade: [tütril, tütriil, tütärdel]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Abl: [tütrilt, tütriilt, tütärdelt]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Tra: [tütris, tütriis, tütärdes]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Ter: [tütriniq, tütriiniq, tütärdeniq]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Abe: [tütrildäq, tütriildäq, tütärdeldäq]
     tütäŕ+N+Pl+Com: [tütridegaq, tütriidegaq, tütärdegaq]
